Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 13

Escheated Estates

Publisher's Notes. Prior to the amendment of Rev. Stat., ch. 57, by Acts 1985, No. 703, which became effective on March 28, 1985, property which qualified for escheatment escheated to and vested in the state.

Cross References. Publication of notice, §16-3-101 et seq.

Transfer of civil duties of prosecuting attorney to county attorney, §16-21-114.

Preambles. Acts 1979, No. 899, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, Arkansas Social Services now provides funds to pay for nursing care for many indigent persons who have no heirs; and

“Whereas, Arkansas Social Services provides a monthly sum to indigent patients to purchase personal supplies; and

“Whereas, the funds provided are often not used and result in a small estate normally being kept for the individual under nursing home accounting procedures; and

“Whereas, a procedure for these funds to escheat to the state is long and expensive; and

“Whereas, the moneys have originally come from Arkansas Social Services and should be returned to Arkansas Social Services;

“Now therefore….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1885, No. 18, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1985, No. 703, § 8: Mar. 28, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present law provides for escheated estates to become the property of the State; that due to the financial hardships facing counties it now appears more equitable to allow estates to escheat to the county wherein the decedent resided at death; that such property will continue to escheat to the State until this Act goes into effect. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

28-13-101. Applicability of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all estates which have not escheated to the state prior to March 28, 1985.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 703, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-1833.

28-13-102. Prerequisites to escheat of property.

If any person dies seized of any real or personal estate, without any devise thereof, and leaving no heirs or representatives capable of inheriting the estate, or the devisees are incapable of holding the estate, and when there is no owner of real estate capable of holding the estate, the estate shall escheat to and vest in the county wherein the decedent resided at death.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 57, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 4078; Pope's Dig., § 5087; Acts 1985, No. 703, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-1801.

28-13-103. Claims for nursing care of intestate.

If any person dies seized of any real or personal estate, with no surviving spouse or minor children and the person has received nursing care paid in whole or in part by the Department of Human Services, then the department shall be entitled to reimbursement for the total amount of nursing care paid for by the department for the intestate.

The department may file as a distributee under the provisions of § 28-41-101 for the sum total of all nursing home payments made by the state on behalf of the intestate decedent when:

The department is informed or has reason to believe that there are no known heirs or legal representatives of the intestate, or that no person will appear within one (1) year after granting letters of administration; or

There has been no pleading filed to dispense with administration under § 28-41-101 to claim the personal estate of the intestate as next of kin.

In the event that the property remaining exceeds the amount of payment made by the department on behalf of the decedent, the excess funds shall escheat to the state under the procedures of this chapter.

Cross References. Intestate succession, §28-9-201 et seq.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Probate Law, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.631.

The court having the settlement of accounts with the administrator, upon the production of the county treasurer's certificate to them, shall credit the administrator with the amount.

However, if payment shall not be made, the prosecuting attorney for the district shall move the court for judgment against the administrator and his or her securities, or either of them, for such balance and three percent (3%) per month thereon, giving to the administrator and his or her securities ten days' notice of the intended motion. The court shall hear and determine the motion in a summary manner, without the necessity of formal pleading.

If the administrator or his or her securities do not produce the county treasurer's certificate showing full payment into the county treasury, the court shall render judgment against the administrator and his or her securities, or such of them as shall receive notice, for the amount due, and three percent (3%) per month thereon from the time the balance was first ascertained until the rendition of the judgment, and the costs of the proceedings, and issue execution thereon.

If the certificate of the Auditor of State is produced, the administrator and his or her securities shall, nevertheless, be adjudged to pay the costs of the proceedings and shall in no case recover costs.

Examine the proceedings of the administration;

Cause process to be issued to compel the prompt settlement of his or her accounts;

Attend the settlement, when necessary, on behalf of the county;

Contest any item which to him or her shall appear unjust or unreasonable; and

In case of waste and mismanagement of the estate, or other maladministration, cause proper suits and proceedings to be instituted and prosecuted.

Cited: Newton County v. West, 293 Ark. 461, 739 S.W.2d 141 (1987).

Cited: Newton County v. West, 293 Ark. 461, 739 S.W.2d 141 (1987).

A copy of the petition shall be served on the prosecuting attorney for the district, who shall put in an answer to the petition.

The court shall examine the claim and the allegations and proofs. If it finds that the person is entitled to any money paid into the treasury, the court shall make an order directing the county treasurer to issue his or her warrant on the county treasurer for the payment of the money, but without interest or costs. A copy of the order, under the seal of the court, shall be a sufficient voucher for issuing the warrant.

(1)If any person appears and claims lands vested in the county within seven (7) years after the death of the last person seized, the person, other than one who was served with scire facias or appeared to the proceeding or the person's heirs or assigns, may file his or her petition in the circuit court in the county or district where the land may lie, setting forth the nature of his or her demand or claim and praying that the estate may be relinquished to him or her.

All persons who fail to appear and file their petitions within the time limited shall be forever barred, except the usual saving to infants.

Cited: Newton County v. West, 293 Ark. 461, 739 S.W.2d 141 (1987).

History.

Acts 1979, No. 899, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2615 — 62-2617; Acts 2001, No. 927, § 1.

28-13-104. Settlement of administrator's accounts.

When there is administration granted and there are no known heirs or legal representatives of the intestate, or no person shall appear, within two (2) years after granting letters of administration, to claim the personal estate of the intestate, as next of kin, the administrator, in the settlement of his or her accounts with the proper court, shall account for all money which may come to his or her hands as administrator.

If there is an amount more than sufficient to pay the debts of the deceased and the expenses of the administration, the court, on settlement, shall ascertain the amount remaining in the hands of the administrator and grant duplicate certificates thereof, one (1) of which shall be delivered to the prosecuting attorney and the other to the county treasurer, who shall charge the administrator with the amount.

The administrator shall pay the amount into the county treasury within three (3) months after the settlements. When the administrator pays the amount, the county treasurer shall give him or her a receipt therefor and credit him or her with the amount so paid into the treasury.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 57, §§ 2-7; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4079-4084; Pope's Dig., §§ 5088-5093; Acts 1985, No. 703, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-1802 — 62-1807.

28-13-105. Prosecuting attorney — Duties.

When there are no known heirs or legal representatives, the prosecuting attorney for the district within which the courts are held wherein the accounts of any such administrator are required to be settled shall:

He or she is required, in behalf of the county, to do all things touching the administration which could be done by any sole heir, and especially to preserve the real estate from being improperly sold, wasted, or damaged.

It is made his or her special duty, by himself or herself or his or her deputy, whom he or she may make, when inconvenient to attend in person, to attend all the courts in his or her district in which any case under this chapter may be pending.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 57, §§ 8, 9; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4085, 4086; Pope's Dig., §§ 5094, 5095; Acts 1985, No. 703, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-1808, 62-1809.

28-13-106. Escheat of real property — Proceedings.

(1)When the prosecuting attorney for the district has been informed or has reason to believe that any real estate within his or her district has escheated to the county and the estate has not been sold, according to law, within three (3) years after the death of the person last seized for the payment of the debts of the deceased, he or she shall file an information, in behalf of the county, in the circuit court of the county in which the estate is situated.

The information shall set forth a description of the estate, the name of the person last lawfully seized, the names of the terre-tenants and persons claiming the estate, if known, and the facts and circumstances in consequence of which the estate is claimed to have escheated, and alleging that, by reason thereof, the county has the right to the estate.

The court shall award and issue a scire facias against the person, bodies politic or corporate, who are alleged in the information to hold, possess, or claim the estate, requiring them to appear and show cause why the estate should not be vested in the county, at the next term of the court.

The scire facias shall be served fifteen (15) days before the return day thereof.

The court shall make an order setting forth briefly the contents of the information and requiring all persons interested in the estate to appear and show cause, at the next term of the court, why the estate shall not be vested in the county. The order shall be published for four (4) weeks in a newspaper printed in the county.

All persons, bodies politic and bodies corporate, named in the information as terre-tenants or claimants of the estate may appear and plead to the proceeding and may traverse the facts stated in the information or the title of the county to the lands and tenements therein mentioned at any time on or before the third day after the return of the scire facias. Any other person claiming an interest in the estate may appear and be made defendant and plead by motion for that purpose in open court within the time allowed for pleading.

If any person appears and denies the title set up by the county, or traverses any material fact in the information, issue shall be made up and tried as other issues of fact.

A survey may be ordered as in other cases where the titles or boundaries of land are drawn in question.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 57, §§ 10-13, 15; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4087-4090, 4092; Pope's Dig., §§ 5096-5099, 5101; Acts 1985, No. 703, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-1810 — 62-1813, 62-1815.

28-13-107. Escheat of real property — Judgments.

If no person appears and pleads, or, appearing, refuses to plead within the term, then judgment shall be rendered that the county is seized of the lands and tenements in the information claimed.

(1)If, after the issues are tried, it appears from the facts found or admitted that the county has good title to the lands and tenements in the information mentioned, or any part thereof, then judgment shall be rendered that the county is seized thereof and shall recover costs against the defendant.

When any judgment shall be rendered that the county is seized of any real estate, the judgment shall contain a description of the real estate and shall vest the title in the county.

(1)If it appears that the county has no title in the estate, the defendant shall recover his or her costs, to be taxed and certified by the clerk. Upon the certificate's being filed in his or her office, the county treasurer shall issue a warrant therefor on the treasury of the county, which shall be paid as other demands on the treasury.

However, no defendant shall be entitled to recover costs unless the title to the estate appears to the court, by the facts found, to be in him or her.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 57, §§ 14, 16-18; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4091, 4093-4095; Pope's Dig., §§ 5100, 5102-5104; Acts 1985, No. 703, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-1814, 62-1816 — 62-1818.

28-13-108. Escheat of real property — Vesting title in county.

A writ shall be issued to the sheriff of the proper county commanding the sheriff to seize the real estate vested in the county.

Upon the return of the writ of seizure, the prosecuting attorney for the district shall:

Cause the record and process to be exemplified under the seal of the court;

Deposit the record and process in the office of the county treasurer; and

Cause a transcript of the judgment to be recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the lands lie.

The judgment shall preclude all parties and privies thereto, their heirs and assigns, so long as the judgment shall remain in force.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 57, §§ 19, 20; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4096, 4097; Pope's Dig., §§ 5105, 5106; Acts 1985, No. 703, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-1819, 62-1820.

28-13-109. Sale of escheated real estate.

The county judge may cause the estate to be sold at any time after seizure, in such manner as may be provided by the quorum court. In such a case, the claimants shall be entitled to the proceeds, in lieu of the real estate, upon obtaining a decree or order reclaiming the escheated property, as provided for in §28-13-110.

All lands escheated to the State of Arkansas under the provisions of law shall be sold in the manner provided in this section.

The Commissioner of State Lands shall cause the lands to be sold by the sheriffs of the several counties in which the lands may be situated, at the courthouse door in the county, at public auction for cash, on the first day of the circuit court, but first giving four (4) weeks' notice of the time, place, and terms of the sale and published in a newspaper published in the county. If there is no newspaper therein, then publication shall be by notices posted at six (6) of the most public places in the county four (4) weeks before the day of sale.

Immediately upon the receipt of the purchase money, the sheriff shall pay the purchase money over to the Treasurer of State for use of the Public School Fund of the state and report the sale and the amount for which the lands were sold to the Commissioner of State Lands who shall make and keep a record thereof in his or her office.

If the Commissioner of State Lands shall find the sale to have been in conformity to law and the purchase money fully paid, he or she shall execute a deed under his or her hand and official seal conveying all the title of the state in the lands to the purchaser. The deed, duly executed, shall be admitted to record and received as evidence in all the courts of this state.

As compensation for his or her services in making the sale, the sheriff shall receive two percent (2%) upon the amount of the purchase money received for the land and, also, the actual cost of advertising the sale. These amounts are to be deducted from the purchase money received at the sale.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 57, § 28; Acts 1885, No. 18, §§ 1-4, p. 22; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4105-4109; Pope's Dig., §§ 5114-5118; Acts 1985, No. 703, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-1828 — 62-1832.

28-13-110. Reclamation of escheated property.

(1)(A)If any person appears within seven (7) years after the death of the intestate and claims any money paid into the treasury under this chapter as heir or legal representative, he or she may file a petition in the circuit court in the county in which the decedent resided at death, stating the nature of his or her claim and praying that such money may be paid to him or her.

A copy of the petition shall be served on the prosecuting attorney for the district, who shall answer it. The court shall examine the claim and allegations, together with such proof as may be adduced.

If it appears that the person is entitled to the lands, the court shall decree accordingly. The decree shall divest the interest of the county in the estate. However, no costs shall be adjudged against the county in such a case.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 57, §§ 23-27; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4100-4104; Pope's Dig., §§ 5109-5113; Acts 1985, No. 703, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-1823 — 62-1827.

28-13-111. Review of proceedings.

Any party who has appeared to any proceedings, and the prosecuting attorney for the circuit on behalf of the county, shall have the right to prosecute an appeal or writ of error upon the judgment.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 57, § 21; C. & M. Dig., § 4098; Pope's Dig., § 5107; Acts 1985, No. 703, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-1821.

28-13-112. County treasurer's duties.

The county treasurer shall keep just accounts of all moneys paid into the treasury and of all lands vested in the county under the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 57, § 22; C. & M. Dig., § 4099; Pope's Dig., § 5108; Acts 1985, No. 703, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-1822.